Ohio, session 136, HB80.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio:
S 1. All items in this act are hereby appropriated out of any moneys in the state
ECTION
treasury to the credit of the designated fund. For all appropriations made in this act, those in the first
column are for fiscal year 2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027.
1 2 3 4 5
A OIC INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION
B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group
C 5W30 845321 Operating Expenses $48,801,400 $49,840,500
D 5W30 845402 Rent - William Green Building $1,158,000 $1,158,000
E 5W30 845410 Attorney General Payments $3,186,666 $3,298,199
F Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $53,146,066 $54,296,699
G TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $53,146,066 $54,296,699
S 2. RENT - WILLIAM GREEN BUILDING
ECTION
The foregoing appropriation item 845402, Rent - William Green Building, shall be used for
rent and operating expenses for the space occupied by the Industrial Commission in the William
Green Building.
S 3. Law contained in the main operating appropriations act of the 136th General
ECTION
Assembly that applies generally to the appropriations made in that act also applies generally to the

H. B. No. 80 136th G.A.
2
appropriations made in this act.
S 4. The provisions of law contained in this act, and their applications, are severable. If
ECTION
any provision of law contained in this act, or if any application of any provision of law contained in
this act, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions of law contained in this act and
their applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.
S 5. The sections of law contained in this act, and the items of law of which the
ECTION
sections of law contained in this act are composed, are not subject to the referendum under Ohio
Constitution, Article II, Section 1d and section 1.471 of the Revised Code and therefore go into
immediate effect when this act becomes law.

H. B. No. 80 136th G.A.
Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives.
President ___________________ of the Senate.
Passed ________________________, 20____
Approved ________________________, 20____
Governor.

H. B. No. 80 136th G.A.
This act is not of a general and permanent nature and does not require a
code section number.
Director, Legislative Service Commission.
Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____
day of ___________, A. D. 20____.
Secretary of State.
File No. _________ Effective Date ___________________